Massachusetts, session 194th, H3287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 7C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 73. There is hereby established a special commission on abandoned state
properties to determine the feasibility of repurposing abandoned state properties into drug
addiction treatment facilities.
The special commission may conduct public hearings, forums or meetings to gather
information regarding the repurposing of abandoned state properties into drug addiction
treatment facilities.
of 2

Annually, on or before June 30, the commission shall submit a report to the governor and
the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, along with recommendations, if any,
together with drafts of legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect. The
special commission may file such interim reports and recommendations as it considers
appropriate.
of 2